Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Administration, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Chapter 391-1 et seq.

12-1-1. "Department" defined.

As used in this title, the term "department" means the Department of Natural Resources.

12-1-2. References to administrative law judge or hearing officer; references to final decision of Board of Natural Resources; filing request for administrative review.

Any reference in this title to an administrative law judge or hearing officer shall mean an administrative law judge appointed by the chief state administrative law judge. The decision of an administrative law judge shall constitute the final administrative decision in any matter, and any party to the matter, including without limitation the department, the director of the Environmental Protection Division, the Asbestos Licensing Board, and the Shore Protection and Coastal Marshlands Protection Committees, shall have the right of judicial review in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50.

Any reference in this title to a final decision of the Board of Natural Resources shall mean a final administrative decision by an administrative law judge.

Any request for administrative review by an administrative law judge shall be filed with the decision maker or entity within the department whose decision is to be reviewed.

(Code 1981, §

12-1-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 706, § 1.)

Law reviews.

-
For note on the 1995 enactment of this Code section, see 12 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 51 (1995).